Wyoming, session 2025, SF0171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 15-1-413(a) is amended to read:
15-1-413. Survey of boundaries; when and how to be
made; presumption once recorded.
(a) If the boundaries of any city or town are
uncertain or incapable of ascertainment, and upon the
change in boundaries of any city or town pursuant to any
annexation under this chapter, the governing body, by
ordinance, shall may provide for a survey thereof. When If
the survey is made, the boundaries shall be marked by
substantial monuments, and the person making the survey
shall report to the governing body describing the
boundaries by metes and bounds. The description as nearly
as possible shall refer, if upon surveyed lands, to the
corners or lines of the United States surveys. The person
making the survey shall also file with the city or town
clerk the field notes of his survey. The city or town
clerk shall then file a copy of the report and a copy of
the field notes certified by the mayor and clerk with the
county clerk for the county in which the city or town is
located.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0171
ENROLLED ACT NO. 89, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2